Hawaii statutes.
[§321-317] Rules. The director of
health shall adopt rules necessary for the purposes of this part pursuant to
chapter 91. The rules shall include the director's determination of the
penalties to be assessed for any failure of a health care professional or
laboratory director to comply with the reporting requirements established under
this part. [L 1987, c 186, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next